Maryland, session 2025, HB0377.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–758.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0377*

HOUSE BILL 377
INDICATED.
(2) “COUNTY BOARD” MEANS THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY
BOARD OF EDUCATION.
(3) “PARENTAL ENGAGEMENT LEAVE” MEANS LEAVE AWAY FROM
WORK PROVIDED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(4) “QUALIFIED EMPLOYEE” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO:
(I) 1. IS THE PARENT OF A SCHOOL STUDENT; OR
2. HAS LEGAL CUSTODY OF A SCHOOL STUDENT AS A
LEGAL GUARDIAN; AND
(II) USES PARENTAL ENGAGEMENT LEAVE IN ACCORDANCE
WITH AN EMPLOYER POLICY.
(5) “SCHOOL” MEANS A PUBLIC OR NONPUBLIC ELEMENTARY OR
SECONDARY SCHOOL IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY, INCLUDING A CHARTER
SCHOOL.
(B) SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS OF THIS SECTION, AN EMPLOYER IN
PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY THAT PROVIDES PARENTAL ENGAGEMENT LEAVE TO
ITS EMPLOYEES DURING THE TAXABLE YEAR IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (C)
OF THIS SECTION MAY CLAIM A CREDIT AGAINST THE STATE INCOME TAX:
(1) IN THE AMOUNT CALCULATED UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS
SECTION; AND
(2) AFTER ATTACHING THE CERTIFICATION FORM REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION TO THE INCOME TAX RETURN OF THE EMPLOYER.
(C) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, ANY
PARENTAL ENGAGEMENT LEAVE PROVIDED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE:
(I) PROVIDED AT THE DISCRETION OF AN EMPLOYER FOR THE
BENEFIT OF A QUALIFIED EMPLOYEE OF THE EMPLOYER;
(II) USED FOR ALLOWING THE QUALIFIED EMPLOYEE TO
ATTEND SCHOOL–RELATED MEETINGS OR EVENTS AT THE SCHOOL IN WHICH THE
STUDENT OF THE QUALIFIED EMPLOYEE IS ENROLLED;

HOUSE BILL 377 3
(III) ESTABLISHED BY WRITTEN POLICY;
(IV) AT LEAST 10 BUT NOT MORE THAN 20 HOURS OF LEAVE PER
QUALIFIED EMPLOYEE;
(V) PAID AT THE SAME WAGE RATE AS THE QUALIFIED
EMPLOYEE NORMALLY EARNS; AND
(VI) SUPPLEMENTAL TO, WITHOUT SUPPLANTING, ANY OTHER
LEAVE OR BENEFITS PROVIDED BY THE EMPLOYER TO THE QUALIFIED EMPLOYEE.
(2) AN EMPLOYER THAT PROVIDES PARENTAL ENGAGEMENT LEAVE
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL PROHIBIT:
(I) A QUALIFIED EMPLOYEE FROM EXHAUSTING THE
QUALIFIED EMPLOYEE’S ENTIRE LEAVE BALANCE IN FEWER THAN THREE
OCCURRENCES OF LEAVE USAGE; AND
(II) THE TRANSFER OF HOURS OF PARENTAL ENGAGEMENT
LEAVE BETWEEN EMPLOYEES.
(D) (1) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE THE PRODUCT OF A
QUALIFIED EMPLOYEE’S HOURLY WAGE RATE AND THE NUMBER OF PARENTAL
ENGAGEMENT LEAVE HOURS USED BY THE QUALIFIED EMPLOYEE DURING THE
TAXABLE YEAR.
(II) THE HOURLY WAGE RATE FOR A SALARIED EMPLOYEE
SHALL BE DETERMINED BASED ON THE MINIMUM WEEKLY NUMBER OF HOURS THAT
THE QUALIFIED EMPLOYEE IS REQUIRED TO WORK UNDER THE QUALIFIED
EMPLOYEE’S HIRING AGREEMENT.
(2) FOR ANY TAXABLE YEAR:
(I) AN EMPLOYER MAY CLAIM THE CREDIT FOR MORE THAN
ONE QUALIFIED EMPLOYEE, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER ANOTHER QUALIFIED
EMPLOYEE HAS USED PARENTAL ENGAGEMENT LEAVE FOR THE SAME STUDENT;
AND
(II) THE AGGREGATE AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER
THIS SECTION MAY NOT EXCEED $800 FOR EACH QUALIFIED EMPLOYEE OF AN
EMPLOYER.

HOUSE BILL 377
(3) AN EMPLOYER MAY NOT CLAIM THE CREDIT FOR A QUALIFIED
EMPLOYEE WHO HAS NOT WORKED AT LEAST 30 DAYS DURING THE TAXABLE YEAR
FOR THE EMPLOYER.
(E) (1) TO RECEIVE THE CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION, AN EMPLOYER
SHALL:
(I) OBTAIN FROM EACH QUALIFIED EMPLOYEE FOR WHOM THE
CREDIT IS SOUGHT A CERTIFICATION FORM UNDER THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(II) ATTACH EACH CERTIFICATION FORM TO THE INCOME TAX
RETURN OF THE EMPLOYER.
(2) THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION SHALL, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE COMPTROLLER, DEVELOP AND MAKE AVAILABLE A
CERTIFICATION FORM TO BE USED IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(3) (I) AS A CONDITION OF USING PARENTAL ENGAGEMENT LEAVE
UNDER THIS SECTION, A QUALIFIED EMPLOYEE SHALL AGREE TO OBTAIN FROM THE
APPROPRIATE SCHOOL OFFICIALS PROOF OF ATTENDING THE SCHOOL–RELATED
MEETING OR EVENT FOR WHICH THE LEAVE IS USED BY SUBMITTING THE
CERTIFICATION FORM TO:
1. IF THE STUDENT OF THE QUALIFIED EMPLOYEE IS
ENROLLED IN A PUBLIC SCHOOL, THE SCHOOL PRINCIPAL AND COUNTY BOARD
MEMBER WHO REPRESENTS THE SCHOOL; OR
2. IF THE STUDENT OF THE QUALIFIED EMPLOYEE IS
ENROLLED IN A NONPUBLIC SCHOOL, THE SCHOOL PRINCIPAL AND ANOTHER
ADMINISTRATOR OF THE SCHOOL.
(II) A COUNTY BOARD MEMBER OR SCHOOL PRINCIPAL OR
ADMINISTRATOR SHALL PROMPTLY SIGN AND RETURN A CERTIFICATION FORM TO A
QUALIFIED EMPLOYEE WHO ATTENDS A SCHOOL–RELATED MEETING OR EVENT.
(III) A QUALIFIED EMPLOYEE SHALL PROMPTLY RETURN A
SIGNED CERTIFICATION FORM TO THE QUALIFIED EMPLOYEE’S EMPLOYER.
(F) IF THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION IN ANY TAXABLE YEAR
EXCEEDS THE STATE INCOME TAX FOR THAT TAXABLE YEAR, THE EMPLOYER MAY
CLAIM A REFUND IN THE AMOUNT OF THE EXCESS.

HOUSE BILL 377 5
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024.